apertium-jta.jta.lexd
# Adapted from the Standard Tamil apertium-tam available at https://github.com/apertium/apertium-tam.git, by Maathavan Nithiyananthan <maathumaathavan@gmail.com>
# Morphological Transducer for Jaffna Tamil

# Part of speech categories
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <n>      # Noun
# <np>     # Proper nouns
# <top>    # Toponyms
# <v>      # Verb
# <vbmod>  # Modal verb
# <vbser>  # Verb 'to be'
# <vbdo>   # Verb 'to do'
# <vaux>   # Auxiliary verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <det>    # Determiner
# <ij>     # Interjections
# <comp>   # Comparative
# <post>   # Postposition
# <emph>   # Emphatic particle
# <caus>   # Causative particle
# <neg>    # Negative particle
# <voc>    # Vocative particle
# <quo>    # Quotative particle
# <cnj>    # Conjunctions
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <sg>     # Singular
# <pl>     # Plural
# <epl>    # Epicene Plural
# <unc>    # Uncountable

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################
